North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 4. Cooperation of Federal and State Governments in Agricultural Work.

§ 106-23.
Legislative assent to Adams Act for experiment station.

Legislative assent be and the same is hereby given to the purpose of an act of Congress approved March 16, 1906, entitled “An Act to provide for an increased annual appropriation for agricultural experiment stations, and regulating the expenditure thereof,” known as the Adams Act, and the money appropriated by this act be and the same is hereby accepted on the part of the State for the use of the agricultural experiment station, and the whole amount shall be used for the benefit of the said agricultural experiment station, in accordance with the act of Congress making appropriations for agricultural experiment stations and governing the expenditure thereof.

History.

1907, c. 793; C.S., s. 4689.